California statutes. Penal Code
An accusatory pleading may charge two or more different offenses connected together in their commission, or different statements of the same offense or two or more different offenses of the same class of crimes or offenses, under separate counts, and if two or more accusatory pleadings are filed in such cases in the same court, the court may order them to be consolidated. The prosecution is not required to elect between the different offenses or counts set forth in the accusatory pleading, but the defendant may be convicted of any number of the offenses charged, and each offense of which the defendant is convicted must be stated in the verdict or the finding of the court; provided, that the court in which a case is triable, in the interests of justice and for good cause shown, may in its discretion order that the different offenses or counts set forth in the accusatory pleading be tried separately or divided into two or more groups and each of said groups tried separately. An acquittal of one or more counts shall not be deemed an acquittal of any other count.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

954.1.

In cases in which two or more different offenses of the same class of crimes or offenses have been charged together in the same accusatory pleading, or where two or more accusatory pleadings charging offenses of the same class of crimes or offenses have been consolidated, evidence concerning one offense or offenses need not be admissible as to the other offense or offenses before the jointly charged offenses may be tried together before the same trier of fact.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

955.

The precise time at which the offense was committed need not be stated in the accusatory pleading, but it may be alleged to have been committed at any time before the finding or filing thereof, except where the time is a material ingredient in the offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

956.

When an offense involves the commission of, or an attempt to commit a private injury, and is described with sufficient certainty in other respects to identify the act, an erroneous allegation as to the person injured, or intended to be injured, or of the place where the offense was committed, or of the property involved in its commission, is not material.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1927, Ch. 611.)
-------------------------------------------

957.

The words used in an accusatory pleading are construed in their usual acceptance in common language, except such words and phrases as are defined by law, which are construed according to their legal meaning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

958.

Words used in a statute to define a public offense need not be strictly pursued in the accusatory pleading, but other words conveying the same meaning may be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

959.

The accusatory pleading is sufficient if it can be understood therefrom:

1. That it is filed in a court having authority to receive it, though the name of the court be not stated.

2. If an indictment, that it was found by a grand jury of the county in which the court was held, or if an information, that it was subscribed and presented to the court by the district attorney of the county in which the court was held. 

3. If a complaint, that it is made and subscribed by some natural person and sworn to before some officer entitled to administer oaths.

4. That the defendant is named, or if his name is unknown, that he is described by a fictitious name, with a statement that his true name is to the grand jury, district attorney, or complainant, as the case may be, unknown.

5. That the offense charged therein is triable in the court in which it is filed, except in case of a complaint filed with a magistrate for the purposes of a preliminary examination.

6. That the offense was committed at some time prior to the filing of the accusatory pleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

959.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 740, 806, 949, and 959 or any other law to the contrary, a criminal prosecution may be commenced by filing an accusatory pleading in electronic form with the magistrate or in a court having authority to receive it.

(b) As used in this section, accusatory pleadings include, but are not limited to, the complaint, the information, and the indictment.

(c) A magistrate or court is authorized to receive and file an accusatory pleading in electronic form if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The accusatory pleading is issued in the name of, and transmitted by, a public prosecutor or law enforcement agency filing pursuant to Chapter 5c (commencing with Section 853.5) or Chapter 5d (commencing with Section 853.9), or by a clerk of the court with respect to complaints issued for the offenses of failure to appear, pay a fine, or comply with an order of the court.

(2) The magistrate or court has the facility to electronically store the accusatory pleading for the statutory period of record retention.

(3) The magistrate or court has the ability to reproduce the accusatory pleading in physical form upon demand and payment of any costs involved.

An accusatory pleading shall be deemed to have been filed when it has been received by the magistrate or court.

When transmitted in electronic form, the accusatory pleading shall be exempt from any requirement that it be subscribed by a natural person. It is sufficient to satisfy any requirement that an accusatory pleading, or any part of it, be sworn to before an officer entitled to administer oaths, if the pleading, or any part of it, was in fact sworn to and the electronic form indicates which parts of the pleading were sworn to and the name of the officer who administered the oath.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a notice to appear issued on a form approved by the Judicial Council may be received and filed by a court in electronic form, if the following conditions are met:

(1) The notice to appear is issued and transmitted by a law enforcement agency prosecuting pursuant to Chapter 5c (commencing with Section 853.5) or Chapter 5d (commencing with Section 853.9) of Title 3 of Part 2 of this code, or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 40300) of Division 17 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) The court has all of the following:

(A) The ability to receive the notice to appear in electronic format.

(B) The facility to electronically store an electronic copy and the data elements of the notice to appear for the statutory period of record retention.

(C) The ability to reproduce the electronic copy of the notice to appear and those data elements in printed form upon demand and payment of any costs involved.

(3) The issuing agency has the ability to reproduce the notice to appear in physical form upon demand and payment of any costs involved.

(e) A notice to appear that is received under subdivision (d) is deemed to have been filed when it has been accepted by the court and is in the form approved by the Judicial Council.

(f) If transmitted in electronic form, the notice to appear is deemed to have been signed by the defendant if it includes a digitized facsimile of the defendant’s signature on the notice to appear. A notice to appear filed electronically under subdivision (d) need not be subscribed by the citing officer. An electronically submitted notice to appear need not be verified by the citing officer with a declaration under penalty of perjury if the electronic form indicates which parts of the notice are verified by that declaration and the name of the officer making the declaration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 567, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

960.

No accusatory pleading is insufficient, nor can the trial, judgment, or other proceeding thereon be affected by reason of any defect or imperfection in matter of form which does not prejudice a substantial right of the defendant upon the merits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

961.

Neither presumptions of law, nor matters of which judicial notice is authorized or required to be taken, need be stated in an accusatory pleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

962.

In pleading a judgment or other determination of, or proceeding before, a Court or officer of special jurisdiction, it is not necessary to state the facts constituting jurisdiction; but the judgment or determination may be stated as given or made, or the proceedings had. The facts constituting jurisdiction, however, must be established on the trial.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

963.

In pleading a private statute, or an ordinance of a county or a municipal corporation, or a right derived therefrom, it is sufficient to refer to the statute or ordinance by its title and the day of its passage, and the court must thereupon take judicial notice thereof in the same manner that it takes judicial notice of matters listed in Section 452 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

964.

(a) In each county, the district attorney and the courts, in consultation with any local law enforcement agencies that may desire to provide information or other assistance, shall establish a mutually agreeable procedure to protect confidential personal information regarding any witness or victim contained in a police report, arrest report, or investigative report if one of these reports is submitted to a court by a prosecutor in support of a criminal complaint, indictment, or information, or by a prosecutor or law enforcement officer in support of a search warrant or an arrest warrant.

(b) For purposes of this section, “confidential personal information” includes, but is not limited to, an address, telephone number, driver’s
 license or California Identification Card number, social security number, date of birth, place of employment, employee identification number, mother’s maiden name, demand deposit account number, savings or checking account number, or credit card number.

(c) (1) This section may not be construed to impair or affect the provisions of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1054) of Title 6 of Part 2.

(2) This section may not be construed to impair or affect procedures regarding informant disclosure provided by Sections 1040 to 1042, inclusive, of the Evidence Code, or as altering procedures regarding sealed search warrant affidavits as provided by People v. Hobbs (1994) 7 Cal.4th 948.

(3) This section shall not be construed to impair or affect a criminal defense counsel’s access to unredacted reports
 otherwise authorized by law, or the submission of documents in support of a civil complaint.

(4) This section applies as an exception to California Rule of Court 2.550, as provided by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of that rule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 867, Sec. 22.   (SB 1144)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

965.

When an instrument which is the subject of an indictment or information for forgery has been destroyed or withheld by the act or the procurement of the defendant, and the fact of such destruction or withholding is alleged in the indictment, or information, and established on the trial, the misdescription of the instrument is immaterial.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

966.

In an accusatory pleading for perjury, or subornation of perjury, it is sufficient to set forth the substance of the controversy or matter in respect to which the offense was committed, and in what court and before whom the oath alleged to be false was taken, and that the court, or the person before whom it was taken, had authority to administer it, with proper allegations of the falsity of the matter on which the perjury is assigned; but the accusatory pleading need not set forth the pleadings, records, or proceedings with which the oath is connected, nor the commission or authority of the court or person before whom the perjury was committed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

967.

In an accusatory pleading charging the theft of money, bank notes, certificates of stock or valuable securities, or a conspiracy to cheat or defraud a person of any such property, it is sufficient to allege the theft, or the conspiracy to cheat or defraud, to be of money, bank notes, certificates of stock or valuable securities without specifying the coin, number, denomination, or kind thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

968.

An accusatory pleading charging exhibiting, publishing, passing, selling, or offering to sell, or having in possession, with such intent, any lewd or obscene book, pamphlet, picture, print, card, paper, or writing, need not set forth any portion of the language used or figures shown upon such book, pamphlet, picture, print, card, paper, or writing; but it is sufficient to state generally the fact of the lewdness or obscenity thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

969.

In charging the fact of a previous conviction of felony, or of an attempt to commit an offense which, if perpetrated, would have been a felony, or of theft, it is sufficient to state, “That the defendant, before the commission of the offense charged herein, was in (giving the title of the court in which the conviction was had) convicted of a felony (or attempt, etc., or of theft).” If more than one previous conviction is charged, the date of the judgment upon each conviction may be stated, and all known previous convictions, whether in this State or elsewhere, must be charged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

969a.

Whenever it shall be discovered that a pending indictment or information does not charge all prior felonies of which the defendant has been convicted either in this State or elsewhere, said indictment or information may be forthwith amended to charge such prior conviction or convictions, and if such amendment is made it shall be made upon order of the court, and no action of the grand jury (in the case of an indictment) shall be necessary. Defendant shall promptly be rearraigned on such information or indictment as amended and be required to plead thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1617.)
-------------------------------------------

969b.

For the purpose of establishing prima facie evidence of the fact that a person being tried for a crime or public offense under the laws of this State has been convicted of an act punishable by imprisonment in a state prison, county jail or city jail of this State, and has served a term therefor in any penal institution, or has been convicted of an act in any other state, which would be punishable as a crime in this State, and has served a term therefor in any state penitentiary, reformatory, county jail or city jail, or has been convicted of an act declared to be a crime by any act or law of the United States, and has served a term therefor in any penal institution, the records or copies of records of any state penitentiary, reformatory, county jail, city jail, or federal penitentiary in which such person has been imprisoned, when such records or copies thereof have been certified by the official custodian of such records, may be introduced as such evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 701.)
-------------------------------------------

969e.

In charging the fact of a previous conviction for a violation of Section 5652 of the Fish and Game Code, or of Section 13001 or 13002 of the Health and Safety Code or of Section 374b or 374d of the Penal Code or of Section 23111, 23112, or 23113 of the Vehicle Code, it is sufficient to state, “That the defendant, before the commission of the offense charged herein, was in (giving the title of the court in which the conviction was had) convicted of a violation of (specifying the section violated).”

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1161.   Note: Former termination clause was deleted by Stats. 1980, Ch. 364, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

969f.

(a) Whenever a defendant has committed a serious felony as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, the facts that make the crime constitute a serious felony may be charged in the accusatory pleading. However, the crime shall not be referred to as a serious felony nor shall the jury be informed that the crime is defined as a serious felony. This charge, if made, shall be added to and be a part of the count or each of the counts of the accusatory pleading which charged the offense. If the defendant pleads not guilty to the offense charged in any count which alleges that the defendant committed a serious felony, the question whether or not the defendant committed a serious felony as alleged shall be tried by the court or jury which tries the issue upon the plea of not guilty. If the defendant pleads guilty of the offense charged, the question whether or not the defendant committed a serious felony as alleged shall be separately admitted or denied by the defendant. 

(b) In charging an act or acts that bring the defendant within the operation of paragraph (8) or (23) of subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, it is sufficient for purposes of subdivision (a) if the pleading states the following: 

“It is further alleged that in the commission and attempted commission of the foregoing offense, the defendant ____, personally [inflicted great bodily injury on another person, other than an accomplice] [used a firearm, to wit: ____,] [used a dangerous and deadly weapon, to wit: ____,] within the meaning of Sections 667 and 1192.7 of the Penal Code.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 249, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

969.5.

(a) Whenever it shall be discovered that a pending complaint to which a plea of guilty has been made under Section 859a does not charge all prior felonies of which the defendant has been convicted either in this state or elsewhere, the complaint may be forthwith amended to charge the prior conviction or convictions and the amendments may and shall be made upon order of the court. The defendant shall thereupon be arraigned before the court to which the complaint has been certified and shall be asked whether he or she has suffered the prior conviction. If the defendant enters a denial, his or her answer shall be entered in the minutes of the court. The refusal of the defendant to answer is equivalent to a denial that he or she has suffered the prior conviction.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the question of whether or not the defendant has suffered the prior conviction shall be tried by a jury impaneled for that purpose unless a jury is waived, in which case it may be tried by the court.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b), the question of whether the defendant is the person who has suffered the prior conviction shall be tried by the court without a jury.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 969½ by Stats. 1998, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

970.

When several defendants are named in one accusatory pleading, any one or more may be convicted or acquitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

971.

The distinction between an accessory before the fact and a principal, and between principals in the first and second degree is abrogated; and all persons concerned in the commission of a crime, who by the operation of other provisions of this code are principals therein, shall hereafter be prosecuted, tried and punished as principals and no other facts need be alleged in any accusatory pleading against any such person than are required in an accusatory pleading against a principal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

972.

An accessory to the commission of a felony may be prosecuted, tried, and punished, though the principal may be neither prosecuted nor tried, and though the principal may have been acquitted.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

973.

If the accusatory pleading in any criminal action has heretofore been lost or destroyed or shall hereafter be lost or destroyed, the court must, upon the application of the prosecuting attorney or of the defendant, order a copy of such pleading to be filed and substituted for the original, and when filed and substituted, as provided in this section, the copy shall have the same force and effect as if it were the original pleading.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 6. PLEADINGS AND PROCEEDINGS BEFORE TRIAL [976. - 1054.10.]



  CHAPTER 1. Of the Arraignment of the Defendant [976. - 993.]

976.

(a) When the accusatory pleading is filed, the defendant shall be arraigned thereon before the court in which it is filed, unless the action is transferred to some other court for trial. However, within any county, if the defendant is in custody, upon the approval of both the presiding judge of the court in which the accusatory pleading is filed and the presiding judge of the court nearest to the place in which he or she is held in custody the arraignment may be before the court nearest to that place of custody.

(b) A defendant arrested in another county shall have the
 right to be taken before a magistrate in the arresting county for the purpose of being admitted to bail, as provided in Section 821 or 822. The defendant shall be informed of this right.

(c) Prior to being taken from the place where he or she is in custody to the place where he or she is to be arraigned, the defendent shall be allowed to make three completed telephone calls, at no expense to the defendant, in addition to any other telephone calls which the defendant is entitled to make pursuant to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 395, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

977.

(a) (1) In all cases in which the accused is charged with a misdemeanor only, they may appear by counsel only, except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3). If the accused agrees, the initial court appearance, arraignment, plea, and all other proceedings, except jury and court trials, may be conducted remotely through the use of technology, as provided by subdivision (c).

(2) If the accused is charged with a misdemeanor offense involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, or a misdemeanor violation of Section 273.6, the accused shall be present for arraignment and sentencing, and at any time during the proceedings when ordered by the court for the purpose of being informed of the conditions of a protective order
 issued pursuant to Section 136.2.

(3) If the accused is charged with a misdemeanor offense involving driving under the influence, in an appropriate case, the court may order a defendant to be present for arraignment, at the time of plea, or at sentencing. For purposes of this paragraph, a misdemeanor offense involving driving under the influence shall include a misdemeanor violation of any of the following:

(A) Subdivision (b) of Section 191.5.

(B) Section 23103 as specified in Section 23103.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(C) Section 23152 of the Vehicle Code.

(D) Section 23153 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), in all cases in which a felony is charged, the accused shall be physically present at the arraignment, at the time of plea, during the preliminary hearing, during those portions of the trial when evidence is taken before the trier of fact, and at the time of the imposition of sentence. The accused shall be physically or remotely present at all other proceedings unless they waive their right to be physically or remotely present, with leave of court and with approval by defendant’s counsel.

(2) The waiver of a defendant’s right to be physically or remotely present may be in writing and filed with the court or, with the court’s consent, may be entered personally by the defendant or by the defendant’s counsel of record.

(A) A defendant’s personal waiver of the right to be physically or remotely present shall be on the record and
 state that the defendant has been advised of the right to be physically or remotely present for the hearing at issue and agrees that notice to the attorney that the defendant’s physical or remote presence in court at a future date and time is required is notice to the defendant of that requirement.

(B) A waiver of the defendant’s physical or remote presence may be entered by counsel, after counsel has stated on the record that the defendant has been advised of the right to be physically or remotely present for the hearing at issue, has waived that right, and agrees that notice to the attorney that the defendant’s physical or remote presence in court at a future date and time is required is notice to the defendant of that requirement.

(3) The court may specifically direct the defendant, either personally or through counsel, to be physically or remotely present at any particular
 proceeding or portion thereof, including upon request of a victim, to the extent required by Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(4) A written waiver of the defendant’s physical or remote presence shall be substantially in the following form:

“Waiver of Defendant’s Physical or Remote Presence”

“The undersigned defendant, having been advised of their right to be present at all stages of the proceedings, including, but not limited to, presentation of and arguments on questions of fact and law, and to be confronted by and cross-examine all witnesses, hereby knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily waives the right to be physically or remotely present at the hearing of any motion or other proceeding in this cause. The undersigned defendant hereby requests the court to proceed during every absence of the defendant that the court may
 permit pursuant to this waiver, and hereby agrees that their interest is represented at all times by the presence of their attorney the same as if the defendant were physically or remotely present in court, and further agrees that notice to their attorney that their physical or remote presence in court on a particular day at a particular time is required is notice to the defendant of the requirement of their physical or remote appearance at that time and place.”

(c) (1) (A) Upon waiver of the right to be physically present by the defendant, criminal proceedings may be conducted through the use of remote technology, except as provided in subparagraphs (D) and (E). The defendant may withdraw the waiver at any time.

(B) The court may specifically direct the defendant, either personally or
 through counsel, to be physically present at any particular felony proceeding or portion thereof, including as provided in subdivision (f).

(C) If the defendant is represented by counsel, the attorney shall not be required to be physically present with the defendant if remote technology allows for private communication between the defendant and the attorney prior to and during the proceeding, unless, upon request of defense counsel, the court allows the appearance without private communication. Any private communication shall be confidential and privileged pursuant to Section 952 of the Evidence Code.

(D) A defendant charged with a felony or misdemeanor shall not appear remotely for a jury trial or court trial, except as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(E) A defendant charged with a felony shall not
 appear remotely at sentencing, except for postconviction relief proceedings and as otherwise provided by law.

(F) A witness may appear at any misdemeanor or felony criminal proceeding, except for felony trial, remotely pursuant to Section 977.3.

(2) (A) A felony defendant who does not wish to be physically or remotely present for noncritical portions of the trial when no testimonial evidence is taken may make an oral waiver in open court prior to the proceeding, or may submit a written request to the court, which the court may grant in its discretion.

(B) This paragraph does not expand or limit the right of a defendant to be personally present with their counsel at a particular proceeding as required by Section 15 of Article 1 of the California Constitution.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the court may allow a defendant to appear by counsel on that day, at a trial, hearing, or other proceeding, with or without a written waiver, if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following to be true:

(A) The defendant is in custody and is refusing, without good cause, to appear in court on that day for that trial, hearing, or other proceeding.

(B) The defendant has been informed of their right and obligation to be personally present in court.

(C) The defendant has been informed that the trial, hearing, or other proceeding will proceed without the defendant being present.

(D) The
 defendant has been informed that they have the right to remain silent during the trial, hearing, or other proceeding.

(E) The defendant has been informed that their absence without good cause will constitute a voluntary waiver of any constitutional or statutory right to confront any witnesses against them or to testify on their own behalf.

(F) The defendant has been informed whether or not defense counsel will be present.

(2) The court shall state on the record the reasons for the court’s findings and shall cause those findings and reasons to be entered into the minutes.

(3) If the trial, hearing, or other proceeding lasts for more than one day, the court is required to make the findings required by this subdivision anew for each day that the defendant
 is absent.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in which the defendant was personally present in court at the commencement of the trial, hearing, or other proceeding.

(e) A court may, as appropriate and practicable, allow a prosecuting attorney or defense counsel to participate in a criminal proceeding through the use of remote technology without being physically present in the courtroom and in accordance with subdivision (f).

(f) Except as otherwise provided by law, the court shall require a prosecuting attorney, defense counsel, defendant, or witness to appear in person at a proceeding, if any of the following conditions are present and cannot be resolved in a reasonable amount of time:

(1) The court does not
 have the technology necessary to conduct the proceeding remotely.

(2) Although the court has the requisite technology, the quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding prevents the effective management or resolution of the proceeding.

(3) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and certify a transcript of the proceeding.

(4) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding prevents defense counsel from being able to provide effective representation to the defendant.

(5) The quality of the technology or audibility at a proceeding inhibits a court interpreter’s ability to provide language access, including the ability to communicate and translate directly
 with the defendant and the court during the proceeding.

(g) (1) Before the court may proceed with a remote proceeding, the court shall have a process for a defendant, defense counsel, prosecuting attorney, witness, official reporter, official reporter pro tempore, court interpreter, or other court personnel to alert the judicial officer of technological or audibility issues that arise during the proceeding.

(2) When the court conducts a remote proceeding that will be reported by an official reporter or official reporter pro tempore, the reporter shall be physically present in the same room as the judicial officer unless doing so would cause a significant delay that would prejudice the parties, in which case the reporter shall be physically present in a court facility. If the reporter is not in the same room as the judicial officer, the reporter shall be given
 the ability to mute and unmute their own audio to allow for communication with the judicial officer.

(h) The court shall make findings on the record that any waiver entered into pursuant to this section is knowingly, voluntarily, and intelligently made by the defendant.

(i) The court shall require any party, witness, or attorney who participates remotely in a criminal proceeding to conduct themselves as if they were appearing physically in the courtroom. Any person speaking on the record shall have their name displayed or state their name.

(j) By April 1, 2025, the Judicial Council shall adopt, and courts shall implement by July 1, 2025, minimum standards for the courtroom technology necessary to permit remote participation in criminal proceedings. The standards shall include, but not be limited to, hard-wired or
 other reliable high-speed internet connections for the judicial officer and court reporter, and monitors, dedicated cameras, speakers, and microphones so the judicial officer, court reporter, and court interpreter can appropriately see and hear remote participants, as well as to ensure that remote participants can appropriately see and hear the judicial officer and other courtroom participants. Court technology shall allow remote participants to be identified during the proceeding to ensure an accurate record.

(k) The Judicial Council shall adopt rules and standards that are necessary to implement the policies and provisions of this section and the intent of the Legislature.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 51, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 29, Sec. 6.   (SB 174)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 7 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

977.

(a) (1) In all cases in which the accused is charged with a misdemeanor only, they may appear by counsel only, except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3). If the accused agrees, the initial court appearance, arraignment, and plea may be by video, as provided by subdivision (c).

(2) If the accused is charged with a misdemeanor offense involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code, or a misdemeanor violation of Section 273.6, the accused shall be present for arraignment and sentencing, and at any time during the proceedings when ordered by the court for the purpose of being informed of the conditions of a protective order issued pursuant to Section 136.2.

(3) If the accused is charged with a misdemeanor offense involving driving under the influence, in an appropriate case, the court may order a defendant to be present for arraignment, at the time of plea, or at sentencing. For purposes of this paragraph, a misdemeanor offense involving driving under the influence shall include a misdemeanor violation of any of the following:

(A) Subdivision (b) of Section 191.5.

(B) Section 23103 as specified in Section 23103.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(C) Section 23152 of the Vehicle Code.

(D) Section 23153 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (c), in all cases in which a felony is charged, the
 accused shall be personally present at the arraignment, at the time of plea, during the preliminary hearing, during those portions of the trial when evidence is taken before the trier of fact, and at the time of the imposition of sentence. The accused shall be personally present at all other proceedings unless they shall, with leave of court, execute in open court, a written waiver of their right to be personally present, as provided by paragraph (2). If the accused agrees, the initial court appearance, arraignment, and plea may be by video, as provided by subdivision (c).

(2) The accused may execute a written waiver of their right to be personally present, approved by their counsel, and the waiver shall be filed with the court. However, the court may specifically direct the defendant to be personally present at any particular proceeding or portion thereof. The waiver shall be substantially in the following form:

“Waiver of Defendant’s Personal Presence”

“The undersigned defendant, having been advised of their right to be present at all stages of the proceedings, including, but not limited to, presentation of and arguments on questions of fact and law, and to be confronted by and cross-examine all witnesses, hereby waives the right to be present at the hearing of any motion or other proceeding in this cause. The undersigned defendant hereby requests the court to proceed during every absence of the defendant that the court may permit pursuant to this waiver, and hereby agrees that their interest is represented at all times by the presence of their attorney the same as if the defendant were personally present in court, and further agrees that notice to their attorney that their presence in court on a particular day at a particular time is required is notice to the defendant of the requirement of their appearance at that time and
 place.”

(c) (1) The court may permit the initial court appearance and arraignment of defendants held in any state, county, or local facility within the county on felony or misdemeanor charges, except for those defendants who were indicted by a grand jury, to be conducted by two-way electronic audiovideo communication between the defendant and the courtroom in lieu of the physical presence of the defendant in the courtroom. If the defendant is represented by counsel, the attorney shall be present with the defendant at the initial court appearance and arraignment, and may enter a plea during the arraignment. However, if the defendant is represented by counsel at an arraignment on an information in a felony case, and if the defendant does not plead guilty or nolo contendere to any charge, the attorney shall be present with the defendant or if the attorney is not present with the
 defendant, the attorney shall be present in court during the hearing. The defendant shall have the right to make their plea while physically present in the courtroom if they request to do so. If the defendant decides not to exercise the right to be physically present in the courtroom they shall execute a written waiver of that right. A judge may order a defendant’s personal appearance in court for the initial court appearance and arraignment. In a misdemeanor case, a judge may, pursuant to this subdivision, accept a plea of guilty or no contest from a defendant who is not physically in the courtroom. In a felony case, a judge may, pursuant to this subdivision, accept a plea of guilty or no contest from a defendant who is not physically in the courtroom if the parties stipulate thereto.
